Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-6213
License, licensing,
or licensure, defined.

License, licensing, or licensure
shall mean permission to engage in a health profession which would otherwise
be unlawful in this state in the absence of such permission and which is granted
to individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications and allows them to perform
prescribed tasks
and use a particular title.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 13;

Laws 2012, LB834, § 12.